Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 4
Home Solicitation Sales

§ 28-43-401. Home solicitation sale defined.

“Home solicitation sale” means a regulated consumer credit sale of goods or services, in which the seller or a person acting for him personally solicits the sale, and the buyer’s agreement or offer to purchase is given to the seller or a person acting for him, at his residence. It does not include a sale made pursuant to a preexisting open-end credit account with the seller or pursuant to prior negotiations between the parties at a business establishment at a fixed location where goods or services are offered or exhibited for sale, a transaction conducted and consummated entirely by mail or telephone, or a sale which is subject to the provisions of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act on the consumer’s right to rescind certain transactions.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-401, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-402. Buyer’s right to cancel.

In addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer may cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase which complies with this part 4.

Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address stated in the agreement or offer to purchase.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given when it is properly addressed with postage prepaid and deposited in a mailbox.

Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the home solicitation sale.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-402, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-403. Form of agreement or offer — Statement of buyer’s rights.

In a home solicitation sale, the seller shall present to the buyer and obtain his signature to a written agreement or offer to purchase that designates as the date of the transaction the date on which the buyer actually signs, and contains a statement of the buyer’s rights that complies with subsection (2) of this section. A copy of any writing required by this subsection to be signed by the buyer, completed at least as to the date of the transaction and the name and mailing address of the seller, shall be given to the buyer at the time he signs the writing.

The statement shall either:

Comply with any notice of cancellation or similar requirement of any trade regulation rule of the Federal Trade Commission which by its terms applies to the home solicitation sale; or

Appear under the conspicuous caption: “BUYER’S RIGHT TO CANCEL,” and read as follows: “If you decide you do not want the goods or services, you may cancel this agreement by mailing a notice to the seller. The notice must say that you do not want the goods or services and must be mailed before midnight of the third business day after you sign this agreement. The notice must be mailed to: ________________________________ .”

Until the seller has complied with this section, the buyer may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller in any manner and by any means of his intention to cancel.

(insert name and mailing address of seller)

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-403, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-404. Restoration of down payment.

Within ten (10) days after a notice of cancellation has been received by the seller or an offer to purchase has been otherwise revoked, the seller shall tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer, any note or other evidence of indebtedness, and any goods traded in. A provision permitting the seller to keep all or any part of any goods traded in, payment, note or evidence of indebtedness is in violation of this section and unenforceable.

If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods shall be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this section, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.

Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this section, the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to him by the seller and has a lien on the goods in his possession or control for any recovery to which he is entitled.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-404, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-405. Duty of buyer — No compensation for services before cancellation.

Except as provided by the provisions on retention of goods by the buyer, subsection (3) of section 28-43-404, Idaho Code, and allowing for ordinary wear and tear or consumption of the goods contemplated by the transaction, within a reasonable time after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer upon demand shall tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale, but he is not obligated to tender at any place other than his residence. If the seller fails to demand possession of goods within a reasonable time after cancellation or revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to pay for them. For the purpose of this section, a reasonable time is presumed to be forty (40) days.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-405, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.